src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON kv33e
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:       FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:s      FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>n    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>na   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ni   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>nnar FemObl_Flag ;

LEXICON kv_flt33
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>r    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>r    FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>rnar FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>rnar FemObl_Flag ;

LEXICON kv34 ! kraft
  kv34e    ;
  kv_flt34 ;

LEXICON kv34e
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt34
 +N+Fem:^IUML F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem:^IUML F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^IUML F_PLGEN   ;

LEXICON kv35
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:ong      		FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ong       		FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ong       		FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:eingjar      	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:ongjar      	FemObl_Flag ; 
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:eingin      	FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:eingina     	FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:eingini     	FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:ongin      	FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:ongina     	FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:ongini     	FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:eingjarinnar 	FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:ongjarinnar 	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:eingir     	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:eingir    		FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:eingjum    	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:eingja     	FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:eingirnar 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:eingirnar 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:eingjunum  	FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:eingjanna  	FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:ongir     		FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:ongir    		FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:ongjum    		FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:ongja     		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:ongirnar 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:ongirnar 		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:ongjunum  		FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:ongjanna  		FemObl_Flag ;
   
LEXICON kv36/2
  kv36 ;
  kv2  ;
  
LEXICON kv36 
  kv36e ;
  kv_flt2 ;

LEXICON kv36e ! støð
  +N+Fem+Sg+Nom: DF_N_SGf_S ;
  +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: FemNom_Flag ;
  +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>na FemObl_Flag ;
  +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: FemObl_Flag ;
  +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ni FemObl_Flag ;
  +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar FemObl_Flag ;
  +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>arinnar FemObl_Flag ;

LEXICON kv37/2
  kv37  ;
  kv2   ;   
   
LEXICON kv37
  kv37e		;
  kv_flt37	;
  
LEXICON kv37e
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:     	   FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:          FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:          FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar      FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>in      FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>nna     FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>nni     FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>arinnar FemObl_Flag ;

LEXICON kv_flt37
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ir    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um    FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a     FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>irnar FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>irnar FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>unum  FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>anna  FemObl_Flag ;

LEXICON kv38 ! negl
  kv2 ;
  +N+Fem+Pl+Nom: DF_NA_PLf_inar ;
  +N+Fem+Pl+Acc: DF_NA_PLf_inar ;
  
LEXICON kv39/22
  kv39  ;
  kv22 ;

LEXICON kv39 ! slógv
  kv39e    ;
  kv_flt39 ;
  
LEXICON kv39e  
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:ógv DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ógv FemNom_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:ónna FemNom_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ógv FemNom_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:ónni FemNom_Flag ;
 +N+Fem:ógv S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt39
 +N+Fem:ógv F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem:ógv F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:ógv F_PLGEN   ;

LEXICON kv40 ! trøð
 kv40e    ;
 kv_flt40 ;

LEXICON kv40e
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:     DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc:     DF_A_SGf_W ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat:     DF_D_SGf_W ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA S_F_SGGEN ;
 
LEXICON kv_flt40 
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:     F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLGEN   ;
 
 
 !! ! Neuter forms
! __________



LEXICON h1 ! eyga
  h1e    ; ! eyga
  h_flt1 ;

LEXICON h1e
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>a DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>a DF_NA_SGn_def   ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>a DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>a DF_NA_SGn_def   ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>a DF_D_SGn        ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>a DF_G_SGn_a      ;

LEXICON h_flt1
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA_u_ur ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD       ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG_na    ;

LEXICON h1_2 ! setta
  h1_2e    ;
  h_flt1_2 ;

LEXICON h1_2e
 h1e ;


LEXICON h_flt1_2
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA_u_ur ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD       ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG	     ;
 
LEXICON h1_2/1_3
 h1_2 ;
 h1_3 ;
 
LEXICON h1_3 ! drama
  h1_3e    ;
  h_flt1_3 ;

LEXICON h1_3e
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>a DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>ai DF_NA_SGn_def   ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>a DF_NA_SGn_indef ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>ai DF_NA_SGn_def   ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>a DF_D_SGn        ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>ai DF_D_SGn        ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>a Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:%>as Neu_Flag      ;


LEXICON h_flt1_3
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>a Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>a Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:%>aini Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:%>aini Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>air Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>air Neu_Flag      ;
 +N+Neu:a N_PLD       ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG	     ;

LEXICON h2 ! hjarta
               h1e        ;
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLNA_u_ur ;
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLD       ;
 +N+Neu:	  N_PLG_na    ;

LEXICON h2e
h1e ;

LEXICON h3/41
 h3 ;
 h41 ;
 
LEXICON h3/5
  h3 ;
  h5 ;

LEXICON h3/22
  h3  ;
  h22 ;


LEXICON h3_s ! universitet
         h3e         ;
! +N+Neu: S_N_S_CMPND ;
         h_flt3      ;

LEXICON h3 ! orð
         h3e         ;
! +N+Neu: S_N_A_CMPND ;
         h_flt3      ;

LEXICON h3e
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;


LEXICON h_flt3f
  h_flt3 ;

LEXICON h_flt3
 +N+Neu: N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu: N_PLG  ;
 
LEXICON h3_2 ! politi
  h3_2e   ;
  h_flt3_2 ;

LEXICON h3_2e
 			+N+Neu:  	S_N_SGNA ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:num  Neu_Flag ; ! politinum
 		    +N+Neu:i 	S_N_SGD  ; ! politii, politiinum
 		    +N+Neu:s 	S_N_SGG  ;


LEXICON h_flt3_2
 h_flt3 ;

!LEXICON h4/5
!  h4 ;
!  h5 ;

LEXICON h4 ! lið
  h4e    ;
  h_flt4 ;

LEXICON h4e
 			  +N+Neu:  S_N_SGNA ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:i Neu_Flag ; ! liði
 			  +N+Neu:  S_N_SGD  ; ! lið, liðnum
 			  +N+Neu:s S_N_SGG  ;
 
LEXICON h_flt4
  +N+Neu: N_PLNA    ;
  +N+Neu: N_PLD     ; ! liðunum
  +N+Neu: N_PLG     ;

LEXICON h4_2 ! guv
  h4_2e  ;
  h_flt4_2 ;
  
LEXICON h4_2e
 			  +N+Neu:  S_N_SGNA ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:  Neu_Flag ; ! guv
 			  +N+Neu:i S_N_SGD  ; ! guvi, guvinum
 			  +N+Neu:s S_N_SGG  ;

LEXICON h_flt4_2  
  h_flt4 ;

LEXICON h4_3 ! bað
  h4_3e  ;
  h_flt4_3 ;

LEXICON h4_3e
 			  +N+Neu:  S_N_SGNA ;
 			  +N+Neu:  S_N_SGD  ; ! bað, baðnum
 			  +N+Neu:i S_N_SGD  ; ! baði, baðinum
 			  +N+Neu:s S_N_SGG  ;

LEXICON h_flt4_3
  h_flt4 ;

LEXICON h4_4 ! læ
  h4_4e  ;
  h_flt4_4 ;

LEXICON h4_4e
 			  +N+Neu:  S_N_SGNA ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:inum Neu_Flag ; ! læinum
 			  +N+Neu:  S_N_SGD  ; ! læ, lænum
 			  +N+Neu:s S_N_SGG  ;

LEXICON h_flt4_4
  h_flt4 ;


LEXICON h5/3
  h5 ;
  h3 ;

LEXICON h5/6
  h5 ;
  h6 ;

LEXICON h5 ! barn
  h5e    ;
  h_flt5 ;

LEXICON h5e
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGDG_is ;

LEXICON h_flt5
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:       N_PLG  ;

LEXICON h6/4
  h6 ;
  h4 ;

LEXICON h6 ! lag
  h6e    ;
  h_flt6 ;

LEXICON h6e
 +N+Neu: S_N_SGNA    ;
 +N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:i Neu_Flag ; ! blaði
 			  +N+Neu:  S_N_SGD  ; ! blað, blaðnum
 			  +N+Neu:s S_N_SGG  ; 

LEXICON h_flt6
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLNA ;
 +N+Neu:^UUML N_PLD  ;
 +N+Neu:       N_PLG  ;

LEXICON h7/3
h7 ;
h3 ;

LEXICON h7/3e
h7 ;
h3e ;

LEXICON h7/4
h7 ;
h4 ;
