src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Shortnouns 
ong+CmpNP/None: kv35 ;
læ+CmpNP/None:læ h4_4e ;
ben+CmpNP/None:ben h3/22 ;
trá+CmpNP/None:trá kv37e ;
vág+CmpNP/None:vág kv36/2 ;
LEXICON Nouns
ong: kv35 ;
eplisong: kv35 ;
kálsong: kv35 ;
signal:signal h3/41 ;
diktat:diktat h3/41 ;
fundament:fundament h3/41 ;
alternativ:alternativ h3/41 ;
kola:kol h1_3 ;
klitika:klitik h1_3 ;
rangeyga:rangeyg h1 ;
nálareyga:nálareyg h1_2 ;
reyvarringseyga:reyvarringseyg h1 ;
narkotika:narkotik h1_2 ;
mokka:mokk h1_3e ;
tequila:tequil h1_3e ;
sjalusidrama:sjalusi#dram h1_2/1_3 ;
panorama:panoram h1_3 ;
forskotsskema:forskotsskem h1_2/1_3 ;
dogma:dogm h1_2/1_3 ;
firma:firm h1_3 ;
nirvana:nirvan h1_3e ;
gehenna:gehenn h1_3e ;
mantra:mantr h1_2/1_3 ;
ólagansoyra:ólagansoyr h1 ;
liða:lið h1_2 ;
gjaldoyra:gjaldoyr h1_2 ;
hjáeista:hjá#eist h1 ;
seytjanur:seytjan h_flt1 ;
fýrur:fýr h_flt1 ;
eittur:eitt h_flt1 ;
tveyur:tvey h_flt1 ;
brotben:brotben h3/22 ;
hjarta:hjart h2 ;
rokkahjarta:rokka#hjart h2 ;
svínahjarta:svína#hjart h2 ;
manshjarta:mans#hjart h2 ;
skálkalág:skálka#lág kv36 ;
negl:negl kv38 ;
trøllanegl:trølla#negl kv38 ;
andnegl:and#negl kv38 ;
plógv:pl kv39 ;
slógv:sl kv39 ;
flá:flá kv37/2 ;
rá:rá kv37/2 ;
lá:lá kv37/2 ;
matará:matar#á kv37 ;
skrá:skrá kv37/2 ;
farmaskrá:farma#skrá kv37 ;
ættarskrá:ættar#skrá kv37 ;
vøruskrá:vøru#skrá kv37 ;
grindavág:grinda#vág kv36 ;
kongurvág:kongur#vág kv36 ;
glaðuvág:glaðu#vág kv36 ;
hjólplógv:hjól#pl kv39 ;
hárógv:há#r kv39/22 ;
andsvar:andsvar h5/3 ;
grótkast:grót#kast h5/3 ;
snopprikstalv:snopprikstalv h5/3 ;
fornbræv:forn#bræv h7/3 ;
endaspæl:enda#spæl h7/3 ;
langaspæl:langa#spæl h7/3 ;
enniknæ:enniknæ h7/4 ;
ennispónsknæ:ennispónsknæ h7/4 ;
hástig:há#stig h3_2 ;
menningarbrek:menningarbrek h3 ;
trol:trol h3 ;
klaver:klaver h3 ;
skyldskaparorð:skyld#skapar#orð h3 ;
innsig:inn#sig h4_3 ;
asbest:asbest h3e ;
elstaráð:elsta#ráð h4_3 ;
lógamál:lógamál h_flt3 ;
ferðslumál:ferðslumál h_flt3 ;
neyðarkor:neyðarkor h_flt3 ;
ellisár:ellisár h_flt3 ;
kongstrøð:kongs#trøð kv40 ;
peglatrøð:pegla#trøð kv40 ;
neytatrøð:neyta#trøð kv40 ;
rættartrøð:rættar#trøð kv40 ;
sildavað:sildavað h6/4 ;
fuglavað:fuglavað h6/4 ;
fiskivað:fiskivað h6/4 ;
kraft:kraft kv34 ;
atdráttarkraft:at#dráttar#kraft kv34 ;
fjøðurkraft:fjøður#kraft kv34 ;
arbeiðskraft:arbeiðs#kraft kv34 ;
trog:trog h4 ;
afturtog:afturtog h4 ;
revastrá:revastrá h4 ;
grundskeið:grund#skeið h3_2 ;
starvslið:starvs#lið h3_2 ;
skipsbreyð:skips#breyð h4_3 ;
endaljóð:enda#ljóð h4_2 ;
framljóð:fram#ljóð h4_2 ;
harmljóð:harm#ljóð h4_2 ;
fjøruti:fjøruti h_flt4 ;
aningarstrá:aningarstrá h_flt4 ;
sneisaboð:sneisa#boð h_flt4_3 ;
fragdarboð:fragdar#boð h_flt4_3 ;
høvuðsráð:høvuðs#ráð h_flt4_3 ;
bakhald:bakhald h3/5 ;
bátshald:bátshald h3/5 ;
evstamark:evstamark h3/5 ;
barbak:barbak h3/5 ;
brunatryggingargjald:bruna#tryggingar#gjald h5 ;
óvitabarn:óvita#barn h5 ;
sperrupar:sperrupar h5 ;
skiftitøl:skiftitøl h_flt5 ;
brøðrabørn:brøðrabørn h_flt5 ;
neytatøð:neytatøð h_flt5 ;
tarvafelag:tarva#felag h6 ;
tollaslag:tollaslag h6 ;
áhaldsblað:áhaldsblað h6 ;
lyndabragð:lyndabragð h5/6 ;
eygbragð:eygbragð h5/6 ;
neyðbragð:neyðbragð h5/6 ;
áløg:áløg h_flt6 ;
brókatøk:bróka#tøk h_flt6 ;
seymaløð:seymaløð h_flt6 ;
læ:læ h4_4 ;
prosa:prosa h1e ;
fyrstadrekka:fyrstadrekk h1e ;
rúsdrekka:rúsdrekk h1e ;
álvara:álvar h1e ;
vindvág:vind#vág kv36e ;
vág:vág kv36/2 ;
rógv:r kv39e ;
náttarrógv:náttar#r kv39e ;
órógv:ó#r kv39e ;
megi:megi kv33e ;
armstyrki:armstyrki kv33e ;
leysafiti:leysafiti kv33e ;
talfrøði:talfrøði kv33e ;
vanskil:vanskil h3e ;
skvalp:skvalp h3e ;
stýriborðslær:stýriborðslær h7/3e ;
bakborðslær:bakborðslær h7/3e ;
urðargrót:urðargrót h3e ;
fossaguv:fossa#guv h4_2e ;
skinnruv:skinn#ruv h4_3e ;
armóð:armóð h4_2e ;
suðurflog:suðurflog h4e ;
omanfleyg:oman#fleyg h4_3e ;
sesam:sesam h4e ;
fulldrøn:fulldrøn h4e ;
náttarlevnað:náttarlevnað h4e ;
pallsmíð:pall#smíð h4_3e ;
ryggjarblóð:ryggjar#blóð h4_2e ;
áratal:ára#tal h5e ;
seglgarn:seglgarn h5e ;
matarvatn:matarvatn h5e ;
ættarlag:ættarlag h6e ;
starvslag:starvslag h6e ;
íhav:íhav h6e ;
longujól:longujól h_flt3f ;
universitet:universitet h3_s ;
kvinnulið:kvinnu#lið h3_2 ;
kálvaknæ:kálva#knæ h7/4 ;
grannalag:granna#lag h4 ;
